Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3508
Law enforcement agency rights.

Nothing in the Workplace Privacy Act limits a law enforcement agency’s right to screen employees or applicants in connection with a law enforcement employment application or a law enforcement officer conduct investigation.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 8.